Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-231
County fair board; claims filed with county board; payment.

Each appointed county fair board shall cause to be filed with the county board from time to time all claims to be paid from money raised by taxation, and such claims shall be allowed and paid in like manner as general claims against the county.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 12, p. 379;

C.S.1922, § 68;

C.S.1929, § 2-221;

R.S.1943, § 2-231;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 10.